Missouri, session 2026, HB1617.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 55.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 55.030, to read as follows:
55.030. 1. (1) The county auditor of a county having a charter form of government
shall prescribe, with the approval of the governing body of the county and the state auditor,
the accounting system of the county. [He] Such county auditor shall keep accounts of all
appropriations and expenditures made by the governing body of the county; and no warrant
shall be drawn or obligation incurred without [his] such county auditor'scertification that an
unencumbered balance, sufficient to pay the same, remains in the appropriation account
against which such warrant or obligation is to be charged. [He] Such county auditor shall
audit and examine all accounts, demands, and claims of every kind and character presented
for payment against such county, and shall approve to the governing body of the county all
lawful, true, and just accounts, demands, and claims of every kind and character payable out
of the county revenue or out of any county funds before the same shall be allowed and a
warrant issued therefor. Whenever the county auditor deems it necessary to the proper
examination of any account, demand, or claim, [he] such county auditor may examine the
parties, witnesses, and others on oath or affirmation touching any matter or circumstance in
the examination of such account, demand, or claim.
(2) At the direction of the governing body of the county, [he] such county auditor
shall audit the accounts of all officers and employees of the county and upon their retirement
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1617 2
from office and shall keep a correct account between the county and all county officers; and
[he] such county auditor shall examine all records and settlements made by them for and
with the governing body of the county or with each other; and the county auditor shall, at all
reasonable times, have access to all books, county records, or papers kept by any county or
township officer, employee, or road overseer. [He] Such county auditor may keep an
inventory of all county property under the control and management of the various officers and
departments and shall annually take an inventory of any such property at an original value of
one thousand dollars or more showing the amount, location and estimated value thereof. [He]
Such county auditorshall perform such other duties in relation to the fiscal administration of
the county as the governing body of the county shall from time to time prescribe.
(3) The county auditor shall not be personally liable for any costs for any proceeding
instituted against [him] such auditor in [his] such auditor's official capacity.
2. (1) The county auditor of a county having a charter form of government or
such auditor's authorized representatives may audit all or part of any political
subdivision or other local governmental entity located primarily within that county:
(a) If, after a discretionary preliminary investigation of the local political
subdivision or governmental entity or its officers or employees, the auditor believes an
improper governmental activity has occurred; or
(b) To otherwise conduct a performance audit according to professional auditing
standards with an objective such as economy, efficiency, effectiveness, internal controls,
or compliance.
3. The costs incurred by the county auditor for all audits initiated under this
section shall be paid out of the respective county auditor's budget.
4. The county auditor shall have access to all records and documents relevant to
conduct an audit under this chapter, provided that the auditor complies with applicable
confidentiality and privacy provisions.
✔